Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 66.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-166
Proper plaintiff.

(ULLCA 903) (a) Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (b) of this section, a derivative action under section 21-165
may be maintained only by a person that is a member at the time the action
is commenced and remains a member while the action continues.

(b) If the sole plaintiff
in a derivative action dies while the action is pending, the court may permit
another member of the limited liability company to be substituted as plaintiff.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 66.
January 1, 2011